Colorado, session 2026A, HB1229.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-4-2203, add (4) as
follows:
25-4-2203. Health disparities and community grant program
human-animal bond - definitions - rules.
(4) (a) SUBJECT TO ADDITIONAL APPROPRIATIONS MADE BY THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO THE GRANT PROGRAM FOR THE PURPOSE OF
SUPPORTING THE HUMAN-ANIMAL BOND, THE GRANT PROGRAM MAY AWARD
GRANTS TO ENTITIES THAT SUPPORT THE HUMAN-ANIMAL BOND AS A SOCIAL
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

DETERMINANT OF HEALTH.
(b) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(I) "HUMAN-ANIMAL BOND" MEANS THE MUTUALLY BENEFICIAL
RELATIONSHIP BETWEEN AN INDIVIDUAL AND A PET ANIMAL WITHIN THE
INDIVIDUAL'S CARE AND CUSTODY.
(II) "PET ANIMAL" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
35-80-102 (10).
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1229

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1229